Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-330
Abortion procedure; protection of viable, unborn child.

In any abortion performed pursuant to section 28-329, all reasonable precautions, in accord with the sound medical judgment of the attending physician and compatible with preserving the life or health of the mother, shall be taken to insure the protection of the viable, unborn child.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 45;

Laws 1979, LB 316, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 695, § 5.